tests/testenc20250326a.aff
SET UTF-8
NEEDAFFIX ~
TRY ayvburgerclxzyŭdwf

PFX u Y 1
PFX u ŭ u ŭ

PFX p Y 3
PFX p 0 x u
PFX p 0 y u
PFX p 0 z u

SFX s Y 3
SFX s u x u
SFX s u y u
SFX s u z u

SFX a Y 1
SFX a 0 0/pu~ .

SFX z Y 1
SFX z 0 0/su~ .

SFX b Y 1
SFX b 0 0/psu~ .

SFX B Y 1
SFX B 0 0/psu .
